District of Columbia statutes.
1-805.01

Determination of eligibility for and amount of Federal benefit payments made by Trustee.

Notwithstanding any provision of a District Retirement Program or any other law, rule, or regulation, the Trustee:

(1)

Shall determine whether an individual is eligible to receive a Federal benefit payment under this chapter;

(2)

Shall determine the amount and form of an individual’s Federal benefit payment under this chapter; and

(3)

May recoup or recover, or waive recoupment or recovery of, any amounts paid under this chapter as a result of errors or omissions by the Trustee, the District Government, or any other person.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 720, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11021
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2681-531, Pub. L. 105-277, § 801(b)
1981 Ed., § 1-763.1.